Utah statutes.
17D-1-208.   Adoption of a resolution or ordinance approving the creation of
a special service district.
(1)  Subject to the provisions of and as provided in this part, the
legislative body of a county or municipality may adopt a resolution or
ordinance approving the creation of a special service district.
(2) (a)  Subject to Subsection (2)(b), a resolution or ordinance adopted by a
legislative body under Subsection (1) may contain changes from the proposal as
set forth in a resolution under Subsection 17D-1-203(1)(a) or a petition under
Subsection 17D-1-203(1)(b), including changes in:
(i)  the boundary of the special service district; and
(ii)  the services to be provided by the special service district.
(b)  The legislative body of a county or municipality may not adopt a
resolution or ordinance under Subsection (1) that approves the creation of a
special service district with a boundary that includes more area than is
included in, or that authorizes the special service district to provide a
service not proposed in, a resolution under Subsection 17D-1-203(1)(a) or a
petition under Subsection 17D-1-203(1)(b), unless the requirements of Sections
17D-1-205, 17D-1-206, and 17D-1-207 are met with respect to the additional
area or service, as the case may be.
